Mississippi statutes. Title 79. Corporations, Associations, and Partnerships
Subarticle D. Definitions.

The 2004 amendment inserted present (11) and (12), and redesignated former (11) through (29) accordingly.

The first 2012 amendment (ch. 382), deleted “at its registered office” preceding “or to the secretary of the corporation” in (d).

§79-4-1.50.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1988, ch. 368, § 13, eff from and after passage (approved April 18, 1988).

[En Laws, 1987, ch. 486, § 1.50]

Former § 79-4-1.50 related to the recording of articles of incorporation.

The 2007 amendment added (9AA).